Washington statutes.
RCW 9.24.020

Fraudulent issue of stock, scrip, etc.

Every officer, agent or other person in the service of a joint stock company or corporation, domestic or foreign, who, willfully and knowingly with intent to defraud:

(1) Sells, pledges, or issues, or causes to be sold, pledged, or issued, or signs or executes, or causes to be signed or executed, with intent to sell, pledge, or issue, or cause to be sold, pledged, or issued, any certificate or instrument purporting to be a certificate or evidence of ownership of any share or shares of such company or corporation, or any conveyance or encumbrance of real or personal property, contract, bond, or evidence of debt, or writing purporting to be a conveyance or encumbrance of real or personal property, contract, bond or evidence of debt of such company or corporation, without being first duly authorized by such company or corporation, or contrary to the charter or laws under which such company or corporation exists, or in excess of the power of such company or corporation, or of the limit imposed by law or otherwise upon its power to create or issue stock or evidence of debt; or,

(2) Reissues, sells, pledges, disposes of, or causes to be reissued, sold, pledged, or disposed of, any surrendered or canceled certificate or other evidence of the transfer of ownership of any such share or shares

is guilty of a class B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ten years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or by both.

[ 2003 c 53 s 17; 1992 c 7 s 5; 1909 c 249 s 387; RRS s 2639. Formerly RCW 9.37.070.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.